Ohio, session 136, HB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.853 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.853. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the westbound and eastbound lanes 7
of United States route number twenty-four between the Indiana 8
border and the Michigan border, through the counties of 9
Paulding, Defiance, Henry, and Lucas, shall be known as the 10
"Heartland Highway." 11
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 12
along the highway indicating its name. 13